apertium-la-es.la.dix
    <pardef n="m/eus__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eo</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ei</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eo</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eum</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eus</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eis</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eorum</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eis</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eos</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ei</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ei</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ea</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eae</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eae</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eam</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ea</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ea</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eis</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>earum</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eis</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eas</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eae</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eae</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eo</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ei</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eo</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eum</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eum</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eum</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eis</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eorum</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eis</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ea</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ea</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ea</l>
          <r>eus<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="meus"><i>m</i><par n="m/eus__det"/></e>
